Virginia statutes. Title 9.1. Commonwealth Public Safety.
Article 2. Division of Forensic Science.

§§ 9.1-117 through 9.1-125.
Repealed by Acts 2005, cc. 868 and 881, cl. 2.

Cross references.

As to the Department of Forensic Science, see §

9.1-1100

et seq.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2005, cc. 868 and 881, cl. 3, provide: “That as of July 1, 2005, the Department of Forensic Science shall be deemed successor in interest to the Division of Forensic Science of the Department of Criminal Justice Services to the extent that this act transfers powers and duties. All right, title and interest in and to any real or tangible personal property vested in the Division of Forensic Science of the Department of Criminal Justice Services shall be transferred to and taken as standing in the name of the Department of Forensic Science.”

Former §§

9.1-117

through 9.1-125, pertaining to the Division of Forensic Science, were derived from:

9.1-117

:

1996, c. 154, 952, § 9-196.1; 2001, c. 844.

9.1-118:

1996, c. 154, 952, §§ 9-196.5, 9-196.6; 2001, c. 844.

9.1-119:

1996, c. 154, 952, § 9-196.4; 2001, c. 844.

9.1-120:

1996, c. 154, 952, § 9-196.7; 2001, c. 844.

9.1-121:

1996, c. 154, 952, § 9-196.11; 2001, c. 844.

9.1-122:

1996, c. 154, 952, § 9-196.12; 2001, c. 844.

9.1-123:

1996, c. 154, 952, § 9-196.8; 2001, c. 844.

9.1-124:

1996, c. 154, 952, § 9-196.9; 2001, c. 844.

9.1-125:

1996, cc. 154, 952, 987, § 9-196.10; 2001, c. 844.